District of Columbia statutes.
36-504

Jurisdiction.

The District of Columbia reserves jurisdiction in a foreign trade zone or subzone in all civil and criminal matters not relating to customs or federal diversity or federal jurisdiction.

History

July 14, 1995, D.C. Law 11-28, § 5, 42 DCR 2569

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-504.
1981 Ed., § 29-724.